Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.26.040

Requirements for special deposit.

A deposit is a special deposit if it is:

(1) A deposit of funds in a bank under an account agreement;

(2) For the benefit of at least two beneficiaries, one or more of which may be a depositor;

(3) Denominated in a medium of exchange that is currently authorized or adopted by a domestic or foreign government;

(4) For a permissible purpose stated in the account agreement; and

(5) Subject to a contingency.

[ 2024 c 23 s 5.]